Utah statutes.
62A-4a-305.   Prevention and treatment programs.

Programs contracted under this part shall be designed to provide voluntary primary abuse and neglect prevention, and voluntary or court-ordered treatment services, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the following community-based programs:

(1)  those relating to prenatal care, perinatal bonding, child growth and development, basic child care, care of children with special needs, and coping with family stress;

(2)  those relating to crisis care, aid to parents, abuse counseling, support groups for abusive or potentially abusive parents and their children, and early identification of families where the potential for abuse and neglect exists;

(3)  those clearly designed to prevent the occurrence or recurrence of abuse, neglect, sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, medical or educational neglect, and such other programs as the division and council may from time to time consider potentially effective in reducing the incidence of family problems leading to abuse or neglect; and

(4)  those designed to establish and assist community resources that prevent abuse and neglect.

